Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 537.545 is amended to read:
537.545. (1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section,  a registration, certificate  of registration,
application for a permit, permit, certificate of completion or ground  water right certificate under
ORS 537.505 to 537.795 and 537.992 is not required for the use of ground water for:
(a) Stockwatering purposes, unless the use exceeds 12,000 gallons  per day and occurs at a new
confined animal feeding operation, as defined in ORS 468B.215;
(b) Watering any lawn or noncommercial or commercial  garden not exceeding  one-half acre in
area in an amount not exceeding 3,000 gallons a day ;
(c) Watering the lawns, grounds and fields not exceeding 10 acres in area of schools  located
within a critical ground water area established pursuant to ORS 537.730 to 537.740;
(d) Single or group domestic purposes in an amount not exceeding 15,000 gallons a day;
(e) Down-hole heat exchange purposes;
(f) Any single industrial or commercial purpose , other than for watering any lawn or com-
mercial garden, in an amount not exceeding 5,000 gallons a day; or
(g) Land application, so long as the ground water:
(A) Has first been appropriated and used under a permit or certificate  issued under ORS 537.625
or 537.630 for a water right issued  for industrial purposes or a water right authorizing use of water
for confined animal feeding purposes;
(B) Is reused for irrigation purposes and the period of irrigation is a  period during which the
reused water has never been discharged to the waters of the state; and
(C) Is applied pursuant to a permit issued by the Department of Environmental  Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture under either ORS 468B.050 to construct and  operate a disposal
system or ORS 468B.215 to operate a confined animal feeding operation.
(2) A ground water use for a purpose that is exempt under subsection (1) of this section,  to the
extent that the use is beneficial, constitutes a right to  appropriate ground water equal to that es-
tablished by a ground water right certificate issued under ORS 537.700.
(3) A ground water use for purposes of watering a commercial  garden that is exempt
under subsection (1)(b) of this  section, when combined with the use of water for purposes
that are exempt under subsection (1)(f) of this section, may not exceed 5,000 gallons a day.
Enrolled House Bill 3372 (HB 3372-B) Page 1
[(3)] (4) Except for the  use of water under subsection (1)(g) of this section, the Water Resources
Commission by rule may require any person or public  agency using ground water for any such
purpose to furnish information with regard to such ground water  and the use thereof. For a use of
water described in subsection  (1)(g) of this section, the Department of Environmental Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture shall provide to the Water Resources Department a  copy of the
permit issued under ORS 468B.050 or 468B.215 authorizing the land application of ground  water for
reuse. The permit shall provide the information regarding the place of use of such water  and the
nature of the beneficial reuse.
[(4)] (5) If it is necessary for the Water Resources Department to regulate the use or distribution
of ground water, including uses for purposes that are exempt under subsection (1) of this  section,
the department shall use as a  priority date for the exempt uses the date indicated in the log for the
well filed with the department under ORS 537.765  or other documentation provided by the well
owner showing when water use began.
[(5)] (6) The person licensed  under ORS 537.747 or permitted under ORS 537.753 (4) that con-
structs a well to allow ground water use for a purpose that is exempt under subsection (1)  of this
section shall provide the Water Resources Department with a map  showing the exact location of the
well on the tax lot. The person  licensed under ORS 537.747 or permitted under ORS 537.753 (4) that
constructs a well shall provide a map required by  this subsection to the department, along with the
well log required by ORS 537.765, no later  than 30 days after the well is completed. The map must
be prepared in accordance with standards  established by the department. The map and well log must
be accompanied by the  fee described in subsection [ (6)] (7) of this section to record the exempt
ground water use.
[(6)] (7) The  Water Resources Department shall collect a fee of $300 for recording an exempt
ground water use  under subsection [ (5)] (6)  of this section. Moneys from fees collected under this
subsection shall be deposited to the credit  of the Water Resources Department Water Right Oper-
ating Fund. Notwithstanding ORS 536.009, moneys deposited to the fund under this subsection  shall
be used for the purposes of evaluating  ground water supplies, conducting ground water studies,
carrying out ground water monitoring, processing ground  water data and the administration and
enforcement of this subsection and subsections [ (3), (5) and (7) ] (4), (6) and (8)  of this section.
[(7)] (8) The  Water Resources Commission shall adopt rules to implement, administer and en-
force subsections [ (5) and (6) ] (6) and (7)  of this section.
(9) As used in this section, “commercial garden”:
(a) Means a garden that is used to grow plants to be sold, traded or bartered.
(b) Does  not mean a location at which plants in the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae
are grown, unless the plants are grown by a person licensed under ORS 571.281.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 537.545, as amended by section  11, chapter 465, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
537.545. (1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a registration, certificate  of registration,
application for a permit, permit, certificate of completion or ground  water right certificate under
ORS 537.505 to 537.795 and 537.992 is not required for the use of ground water for:
(a) Stockwatering purposes;
(b) Watering any lawn or noncommercial or commercial  garden not exceeding  one-half acre in
area in an amount not exceeding 3,000 gallons a day ;
(c) Watering  the lawns, grounds and fields not exceeding 10 acres in area of schools located
within a critical ground water area established pursuant to ORS 537.730 to 537.740;
(d) Single or group domestic purposes in an amount not exceeding 15,000 gallons a day;
(e) Down-hole heat exchange purposes;
(f) Any single industrial or commercial purpose , other than  for watering any lawn or com-
mercial garden, in an amount not exceeding 5,000 gallons a day; or
(g) Land application, so long as the ground water:
Enrolled House Bill 3372 (HB 3372-B) Page 2
(A) Has first been appropriated and used under a permit or certificate  issued under ORS 537.625
or 537.630 for a water right issued  for industrial purposes or a water right authorizing use of water
for confined animal feeding purposes;
(B) Is reused for irrigation purposes and the period of irrigation is a  period during which the
reused water has never been discharged to the waters of the state; and
(C) Is applied pursuant to a permit issued by the Department of Environmental  Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture under either ORS 468B.050 to construct and  operate a disposal
system or ORS 468B.215 to operate a confined animal feeding operation.
(2) A ground water use for a purpose that is exempt under subsection (1) of this section,  to the
extent that the use is beneficial, constitutes a right to  appropriate ground water equal to that es-
tablished by a ground water right certificate issued under ORS 537.700.
(3) A ground water use for purposes of watering a commercial  garden that is exempt
under subsection (1)(b) of this  section, when combined with the use of water for purposes
that are exempt under subsection (1)(f) of this section, may not exceed 5,000 gallons a day.
[(3)] (4) Except for the  use of water under subsection (1)(g) of this section, the Water Resources
Commission by rule may require any person or public  agency using ground water for any such
purpose to furnish information with regard to such ground water  and the use thereof. For a use of
water described in subsection  (1)(g) of this section, the Department of Environmental Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture shall provide to the Water Resources Department a  copy of the
permit issued under ORS 468B.050 or 468B.215 authorizing the land application of ground  water for
reuse. The permit shall provide the information regarding the place of use of such water  and the
nature of the beneficial reuse.
[(4)] (5) If it is necessary for the Water Resources Department to regulate the use or distribution
of ground water, including uses for purposes that are exempt under subsection (1) of this  section,
the department shall use as a  priority date for the exempt uses the date indicated in the log for the
well filed with the department under ORS 537.765  or other documentation provided by the well
owner showing when water use began.
[(5)] (6) The person licensed  under ORS 537.747 or permitted under ORS 537.753 (4) that con-
structs a well to allow ground water use for a purpose that is exempt under subsection (1)  of this
section shall provide the Water Resources Department with a map  showing the exact location of the
well on the tax lot. The person  licensed under ORS 537.747 or permitted under ORS 537.753 (4) that
constructs a well shall provide a map required by  this subsection to the department, along with the
well log required by ORS 537.765, no later  than 30 days after the well is completed. The map must
be prepared in accordance with standards  established by the department. The map and well log must
be accompanied by the  fee described in subsection [ (6)] (7) of this section to record the exempt
ground water use.
[(6)] (7) The  Water Resources Department shall collect a fee of $300 for recording an exempt
ground water use  under subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section. Moneys from fees collected under this
subsection shall be deposited to the credit  of the Water Resources Department Water Right Oper-
ating Fund. Notwithstanding ORS 536.009, moneys deposited to the fund under this subsection  shall
be used for the purposes of evaluating  ground water supplies, conducting ground water studies,
carrying out ground water monitoring, processing ground  water data and the administration and
enforcement of this subsection and subsections [ (3), (5) and (7) ] (4), (6) and (8)  of this section.
[(7)] (8) The  Water Resources Commission shall adopt rules to implement, administer and en-
force subsections [ (5) and (6) ] (6) and (7)  of this section.
(9) As used in this section, “commercial garden”:
(a) Means a garden that is used to grow plants to be sold, traded or bartered.
(b) Does  not mean a location at which plants in the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae
are grown, unless the plants are grown by a person licensed under ORS 571.281.
SECTION 3.
The exemption established by  ORS 537.545 (1)(b) for the use of ground water
for watering any commercial garden does not apply to the use of ground water for  watering
any commercial garden in the Lower Umatilla Basin Groundwater Management Area.
Enrolled House Bill 3372 (HB 3372-B) Page 3
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 5.  ORS 536.900 is amended to read:
536.900. (1) In addition to  any other liability or penalty provided by law, the Water Resources
Commission may impose a civil penalty on a person for violation of:
(a) A term or condition of a permit, certificate or license  issued under ORS chapters 536 to
543A.
(b) ORS 537.130 or 537.535.
(c) ORS 537.545 [ (5)] (6) or a rule described in ORS 537.545 [ (7)] (8).
(d) A commission rule or order that pertains to well maintenance.
(e) ORS 540.045, 540.145, 540.210, 540.310, 540.320, 540.330,  540.340, 540.435, 540.440, 540.570 (5),
540.710, 540.720 and 540.730 or rules adopted under ORS 540.145.
(f) ORS 537.897 or 537.898 (2).
(g) ORS 537.387.
(2) A civil penalty may be imposed under this section for each day of violation  of ORS 537.130,
537.535, 540.045, 540.310, 540.330, 540.570 (5), 540.710, 540.720 or 540.730.
(3) In the event the petitioner knowingly misrepresents the map and petition required  in ORS
541.329, the commission may assess a penalty of up  to $1,000 based upon guidelines to be established
by the commission. In addition, the petition and map shall be amended to correct  the error at the
petitioner’s cost. Affected users shall be given notice as provided in ORS 541.329 (5).
(4) A  civil penalty may not be imposed until the commission prescribes a reasonable time to
eliminate the violation. The commission shall notify the violator of  the time allowed to correct a
violation within 10 business days after the commission first becomes aware of the violation.
(5) Notwithstanding any term or condition of a  permit, certificate or license, the rotation of the
use of water under ORS  540.150 may not be considered a violation under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
(6) The commission may impose  a civil penalty of not more than $2,000 per occurrence for a
violation described in subsection (1)(g) of this section.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 540.045 is amended to read:
540.045. (1) Each watermaster shall:
(a) Regulate the  distribution of water among the various users of water from any natural surface
or ground water supply in accordance with the users’ existing water rights  of record in the Water
Resources Department.
(b) Upon the request of the users, distribute water among the various users  under any partner-
ship ditch,  pipeline or well or from any reservoir, in accordance with the users’ existing water rights
of record in the department.
(c) Divide the waters of the natural surface and ground water sources and  other sources of
water supply among the canals, ditches, pumps, pipelines  and reservoirs taking water from the
source  for  beneficial use, by regulating, adjusting and fastening the headgates, valves or other con-
trol works at the several points of diversion of surface water or the  several points of appropriation
of ground water, according to the users’ relative entitlements to water.
(d) Attach to  the headgate, valve or other control works the watermaster regulates under par-
agraph (c) of this  subsection, a written notice dated and signed by the watermaster, setting forth
that the headgate, valve or other control works has  been properly regulated and is wholly under the
control of the watermaster.
(e) Perform any other duties the Water Resources Director may require.
(2) When a watermaster must rely on a well log or other documentation  to regulate the use or
distribution of ground water, the regulation shall be in accordance with ORS 537.545 [ (4)] (5).
(3) For purposes of regulating  the distribution or use of water, any stored water released in
excess of the needs of water rights calling on that stored water shall be considered natural flow,
unless the release  is part of a water exchange under the control of, and approved by, the
watermaster.
Enrolled House Bill 3372 (HB 3372-B) Page 4
(4) As used in this  section, “existing water rights of record” includes all completed permits,
certificates, licenses and ground water registration statements filed  under ORS 537.605 and related
court decrees.
Passed by House April 22, 2025
Repassed by House May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3372 (HB 3372-B) Page 5